Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 5 Law Enforcement Officers, Firemen, Prison Guards, and Publicly Employed Emergency Medical Technicians

Cross references.

Indemnification of law enforcement officers, firemen, prison guards, and publicly employed emergency medical technicians who are or were killed or permanently disabled in the line of duty, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI.

Offenses of aggravated assault and aggravated battery on peace officers and correctional officers, §§

16-5-21

,

16-5-24

.

Educational grants to children of law enforcement officers, firemen, and prison guards killed or disabled in line of duty, §

20-3-450

et seq.

Compensation of persons for injuries suffered while preventing crime or aiding officers of the law, §

28-5-100

et seq.

Workers’ compensation generally, T. 34, C. 9.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 3, designated Code Sections 45-9-80 through 45-9-91 of Article 5 as Part 1 of said Article, which became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters of the state at the 2000 November general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.